test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kahhaan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - kahhaan: # 1B g-v, CCVV-›CV
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Ill: kahanân
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Loc: kahanist
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Com: kahanáid
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
    kahhaan+N+Ess: kahanin
    kahhaan+N+Par: kahanid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Nom: kahaneh
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Gen: kahanij
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Acc: kahanijd
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Ill: kahanáid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Loc: kahanijn
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Com: kahanijguin
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Abe: kahanijttáá
